Utah statutes.
9-3-407.   Authority -- Powers.
(1) (a)  The authority shall create, operate, and maintain a center that shall
promote the purposes described in Section 9-3-402.
(b)  The center shall:
(i)  have an extensive outreach program that serves all regions of the state;
and
(ii)  collaborate and coordinate with education, arts, technology, and
engineering entities, including schools and industries.
(2)  The authority has perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate
and may:
(a)  adopt, amend, and repeal rules, policies, and procedures for the
regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;
(b)  sue and be sued in its own name;
(c)  maintain an office at any place or places within this state it may
designate;
(d)  adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and rules, not inconsistent with this
part, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority and the
conduct of its business;
(e)  purchase, lease, sell, and otherwise dispose of property and rights-of-
way;
(f)  employ experts, advisory groups, and other professionals it considers
necessary;
(g)  employ and retain independent legal counsel;
(h)  make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or
convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its duties
under this part to create, operate, and maintain a Science Center in Utah;
(i)  procure insurance for liability and against any loss in connection with
its property and other assets in amounts and from insurers it considers
desirable;
(j)  borrow money, receive appropriation from the Legislature, and receive
other public money and accept aid or contributions from any source of money,
property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to
carry out the purposes of this part subject to the conditions upon which the
grants and contributions are made, including gifts or grants from any
department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of this state
for any purpose consistent with this part;
(k)  enter into agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality or
political subdivision of the United States or this state for the purpose of
providing for the creation, operation, and maintenance of a Science Center in
Utah; and
(l)  to do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers
granted by this part.
(3)  All money received by the authority under Subsection (2)(j) and from any
other source shall be for the exclusive use of the authority to create,
operate, maintain, improve, and provide for a Science Center in Utah. The
money received by the authority may not be used for any other purpose or by
any other entity.
